Illinois, session 104th, HB2933.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Agriculture Law of the Civil 5Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding Section 6205-36 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 205/205-36 new)8    Sec. 205-36. Agricultural drought and climate resilience 9report. 10    (a) The Department shall study:11        (1) the specific actions that can be taken and the 12    practices that can be implemented to mitigate the impacts 13    of drought and climate change on agriculture in the State;14        (2) the costs, benefits, and feasibility of 15    establishing and implementing financial and technical 16    assistance programs to mitigate the impacts of drought and 17    climate change on agricultural producers in the State;18        (3) the costs, benefits, and feasibility of using 19    agricultural land management to realize greenhouse gas 20    reductions and maximize carbon sequestration opportunities 21    in the State; 22        (4) the costs, benefits, and feasibility of using 23    floatovoltaics in State waterways; and   HB2933 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 07699 BDA 17743 b1        (5) the costs, benefits, and feasibility of 2    establishing within the Department an Agricultural Drought 3    and Climate Resilience Office for the purpose of providing 4    agricultural producers with the voluntary technical 5    assistance, nonregulatory programs, and incentives 6    necessary to harden the State's agricultural sector to the 7    coming impacts of drought and climate change. 8    (b) The Department may enter into a contract or grant 9agreement with one or more organizations or institutions with 10expertise in environmental and agricultural issues for the 11purpose of completing the tasks delegated to it in this 12Section. In conducting the cost-benefit analyses described in 13this Section, the Department may take into account the value 14of ecosystem services.15    (c) Within 2 years after the effective date of this 16amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Department 17shall report its findings and recommendations to the General 18Assembly by filing a copy of the report described in this 19Section with General Assembly as provided in Section 3.1 of 20the General Assembly Organization Act.  21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 22becoming law.